Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-710.09
Sickness and accident insurance; rules and regulations.

The Director of Insurance may adopt and promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations concerning the procedure for the filing or submission of policies of sickness and accident insurance subject to sections 44-709 to 44-767 as are necessary, proper, or advisable to the administration of such sections. This provision shall not abridge any other authority granted the Director of Insurance by law.

Laws 1957, c. 188, § 10, p. 656;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 139.